Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1573.01
Provisions of law; how construed.

On and after July 1, 2025, unless otherwise specified, whenever any provision of law refers to the Department of Natural Resources or the Department of Environment and Energy in connection with duties and functions of the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment, such law shall be construed as referring to the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment or the Chief Water Officer, as determined by the duties and functions assigned to each in statute.

Laws 2025, LB317, § 5.